North Dakota statutes. TITLE 19 Foods, Drugs, Oils, and Compounds
CHAPTER 19-22.1 Sale of Artificially Colored Potatoes

19-22.1-01.
Sale of artificially colored potatoes prohibited.

No person may sell at retail any potatoes which are artificially colored. For purposes of this chapter, the terms defined in this section have the meanings therein ascribed to them.

“Person” means a natural person, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or other form of business association.

“Retail sale” means a transfer for value to a consumer.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 235, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106.

19-22.1-02.
Artificial coloring.

The department shall prescribe by regulation the meaning of “artificial coloring”.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 235, § 2.

19-22.1-03.
Penalty.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 235, § 3; 1975, ch. 106, § 194.